Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of ORS 291.055 (1)(e), the
following new or increased fees, adopted by the State Department of  Agriculture and ap-
proved by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, are approved:
(1) Livestock brand identification
- Per head of cattle ................... $ 1.35
(2) Livestock brand service call
- Per location ............................ $ 35
(3) Livestock brand identification
- Cattle transport
certification book ...................... $ 3.50
(4) Good Agricultural Practice
(GAP)/Good Handling Practice
(GHP)/Produce GAP hourly
inspection/travel rate
- Four-hour minimum ............... $ 163
(5) Industrial hemp licenses
- Vendor .................................... $ 100
(6) Animal rescue entity
organization fee
- Additional physical
location ..................................... $ 75
(7) Animal rescue entity
intake fee:
(a) 251-500 animals.......................... $ 250
(b) 501-1,000 animals....................... $ 500
(c) 1,001-2,500 animals .................... $ 750
(d) >2,500 animals .......................... $ 1,500
(8) Unique Identification Number
- Domestic kitchen food
establishments .......................... $ 25
Enrolled Senate Bill 5503 (SB 5503-A) Page 1
(9) Discrete weighing devices
(Manufacturer’s rated
capacity):
(a) Not over 400 pounds .................. $ 49
(b) Over 400 pounds, but not
over 1,160 pounds ...................... $ 97
(c) Over 1,160 pounds, but not
over 7,500 pounds ...................... $ 196
(d) Over 7,500 pounds, but not
over 60,000 pounds .................... $ 294
(e) Over 60,000 pounds.................... $ 294
(f) Static railroad track scales ...... $ 1,268
(10) Continuous weighing systems
(Manufacturer’s rated
capacity):
(a) Under 10 tons per hour ............. $ 369
(b) 10-150 tons per hour ................. $ 572
(c) Over 150 tons per hour,
but not over 1,000 tons
per hour .................................... $ 1,143
(d) Over 1,000 tons per hour .......... $ 2,536
(e) In-motion railroad track
scales ........................................ $ 1,268
(11) Liquid-fuel metering devices
for noncorrosive fuels
contained at atmospheric
pressure (Maximum device
flowrate):
(a) Under 20 gallons per minute ..... $ 40
(b) 20-150 gallons per minute .......... $ 196
(c) Over 150 gallons per minute .... $ 294
(12) Special liquid-fuel measuring
equipment (Type):
(a) Liquefied petroleum gas
meters, one inch pipe diameter
or under .................................... $ 294
(b) Over one inch pipe diameter ..... $ 294
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5503 (SB 5503-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate June 5, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5503 (SB 5503-A) Page 3